North Dakota, session 69, SB2361.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 11-11-70 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
11-11-70. Development by a foreign adversary - Prohibition. (Expired effective
July 31, 20252027)
1. A board of county commissioners, including a board in a home rule county, may not
procure, authorize, or approve a development agreement, building plan, or proposal
relating to county development with an individual or government identified as a foreign
adversary under 15 CFR 7.4(a) title 15, Code of Federal Regulations, par t 791.4(a) or
a person identified on the office of foreign assets control sanctions list.
2. This section does not apply to a foreign adversary defined under subsection 1
possessing an interest in real property if the foreign adversary:
a. Is a duly registered business and has maintained a status of good standing with
the secretary of state for seven years or longer before August 1, 2023;
b. Has been approved by the committee on foreign investment in the United States;
and
c. Maintains an active national security agreement with the federal government.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 40-05-26 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
Page No. 1 25.1352.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
40-05-26. Development by a foreign adversary - Prohibition. (Expired effective
July 31, 20252027)
1. A board of city commissioners or city council, including a board or council in a home
rule city, may not procure, authorize, or approve a development agreement, building
plan, or proposal relating to city development with an individual or government
identified as a foreign adversary under 15 CFR 7.4(a) title 15, Code of Federa l
Regulations, par t 791.4(a) or a person identified on the office of foreign assets control
sanctions list.
2. This section does not apply to a foreign adversary as defined in subsection 1
possessing an interest in real property if the foreign adversary:
a. Is a duly registered business and has maintained a status of good standing with
the secretary of state for seven years or longer before August 1, 2023;
b. Has been approved by the committee on foreign investment in the United States;
and
c. Maintains an active national security agreement with the federal government.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Section 47-01-09 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
47-01-09. Public or private ownership - All property subject to - Foreign ownership
prohibited. (Effective through July 31, 20252027)
1. All property in this state has an owner, whether that owner is the United States or the
state, and the property public, or the owner an individual, and the property private. The
state also may hold property as a private proprietor.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the following governments or entities may
not purchase or otherwise acquire title to real property in this state after July 31, 2023:
a. A foreign adversary.
b. A foreign business entity with a principal executive office located in a country that
is identified as a foreign adversary.
c. A foreign business entity in which a foreign adversary owns:
(1) More than fifty percent of the total controlling interests or total ownership
interests, as defined under section 10-19.1-01, in the foreign business
Page No. 2 25.1352.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
entity, unless the foreign business entity was operating lawfully in the United
States on August 1, 2023; or
(2) Fifty percent or less of the total controlling interests or total ownership
interests, as defined under section 10-19.1-01, in the foreign business
entity, if the foreign adversary directs the business operations and affairs of
the foreign business entity without the requirement of consent of any
nonforeign adversary, unless the foreign business entity was operating
lawfully in the United States on August 1, 2023.
3. When requested by a city council or commission, county commission, or title agent or
company, the attorney general shall complete a civil review, to the extent allowable by
law, relating to the qualifications of any foreign adversary business entity acquiring real
property under subdivision c of subsection 2.
4. This section does not apply to an entity possessing an interest in real property under
subsection 2 if the entity:
a. Is a duly registered business and has maintained a status of good standing with
the secretary of state for seven years or longer before August 1, 2023;
b. Has been approved by the committee on foreign investment in the United States;
and
c. Maintains an active national security agreement with the federal government.
5. A foreign government or foreign business entity subject to and in violation of this
section shall divest itself of all real property in this state within thirty-six months after
August 1, 2023.
6. If a foreign government or foreign business entity subject to this section fails to divest
itself of all real property in this state within the period specified under subsection 4, the
state's attorney of the county in which the majority of the real property is situated may
issue subpoenas to compel witnesses to appear to provide testimony or produce
records.
7. Upon receiving testimony and records, if the state's attorney concludes a foreign
government or foreign business entity, in violation of this section, has failed to divest
ownership of real property as required under this section, the state's attorney shall
commence an action in the district court of the county in which the majority of the real
Page No. 3 25.1352.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
property is situated. Once the action is commenced, the state's attorney shall file a
notice pursuant to section 28-05-07 with the recorder of each county where the real
property subject to the action is situated. If the court finds divestment of real property
under this section is proper, the district court shall enter an order consistent with its
findings. As part of the order, the court shall cancel the notice pursuant to section
28-05-08.
8. Pursuant to an order for divestment, a foreign government or foreign business entity
subject to an order shall divest all real property within six months from the date of the
final entry of judgment. A foreign government or foreign business entity that fails to
comply with the court's order is subject to a civil penalty not to exceed twenty-five
thousand dollars.
9. Any real property not divested within the period prescribed by law may be sold at a
public sale in the manner provided under chapter 32-19 through an action brought by
the state's attorney. A title to real property or encumbrance on the real property may
not be deemed invalid by an order of divestiture under this section.
10. A person that is not subject to this section may not be required to:
a. Determine whether another person is subject to this section; or
b. Inquire if another person is subject to this section.
11. For purposes of this section, "foreign adversary" means an individual or a government
identified as a foreign adversary in 15 CFR 7.4(a) title 15, Code of Federa l
Regulations, par t 791.4(a) or a person identified on the office of foreign assets control
sanctions list.
Public or private ownership - All property subject to. (Effective after July 31,
20252027)
All property in this state has an owner, whether that owner is the United States or the state,
and the property public, or the owner an individual, and the property private. The state also may
hold property as a private proprietor.
SECTION 4. DEPARTMENT OF EMERGENCY SERVICES - FOREIGN ADVERSARY
THREAT ASSESSMENT - REPORT - ONE-TIME FUNDING - LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT
REPORT.
1. The department of emergency services shall:
Page No. 4 25.1352.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
a. Identify sectors and industries most vulnerable to foreign adversarial influence,
including critical infrastructure, technology, agriculture, energy, and academia;
b. Assess foreign adversarial influence beyond land acquisition, including strategic
investments, partnerships, and other forms of economic, educational, and
political influence;
c. Evaluate existing investments and activities to determine compliance with
federal, state, and local laws;
d. Identify sectors in which foreign adversarial influence is often unmonitored or
under reported; and
e. Propose broad mitigation strategies relating to identified risks and vulnerabilities
to enhance the state's ability to manage foreign adversarial influence while
supporting economic growth and security.
2. By July 1, 2026, the department of emergency services shall produce a written report
outlining its findings and recommendations. The report must:
a. Provide a detailed analysis of the foreign adversary threats and vulnerabilities
specific to the state;
b. Identify critical risks across sectors, including infrastructure, security, academia,
and economic investments;
c. Provide sector specific mitigation recommendations designed to reduce
vulnerabilities in infrastructure, academic institutions, economic investments, and
other prominent sectors in the state; and
d. Include a proposal providing for the establishment of a state intelligence unit and
the structure, roles, and operational procedures required for continuous
monitoring of foreign adversary threats by the state intelligence unit.
3. Before September 1, 2026, the department of emergency services shall present the
recommendations in the report under subsection 2, and any proposed legislation
necessary to implement the recommendations, to the legislative management. The
findings in the report must remain in the exclusive possession and under the control of
the department of emergency services and is an exempt record under chapter 44-04.
Page No. 5 25.1352.01000